Hawaii statutes.
§92F-13 Government records; exceptions to
general rule. This part shall not require disclosure of:

(1) Government records which, if disclosed, would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

(2) Government records pertaining to the prosecution
or defense of any judicial or quasi-judicial action to which the State or any
county is or may be a party, to the extent that such records would not be
discoverable;

(3) Government records that, by their nature, must be
confidential in order for the government to avoid the frustration of a
legitimate government function;

(4) Government records which, pursuant to state or
federal law including an order of any state or federal court, are protected
from disclosure; and

(5) Inchoate and draft working papers of legislative
committees including budget worksheets and unfiled committee reports; work
product; records or transcripts of an investigating committee of the
legislature which are closed by rules adopted pursuant to section 21-4 and the
personal files of members of the legislature. [L 1988, c 262, pt of §1; am L
1993, c 250, §1]

Cross References

Auditor's working papers, see §23-9.5.

Case Notes

Because plaintiff did not claim that the police department's
reliance on this section and §92F-22 was improper or unwarranted, the police
department was entitled to withhold documents under the sections. 937 F. Supp.
2d 1220 (2013).

Development proposals were government records that, by their
nature, must be kept confidential in order to avoid frustration of a legitimate
government function within meaning of paragraph (3). 74 H. 365, 846 P.2d 882.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next